California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) The person in charge of the hospital or facility, or his or her designee, may provide telephonic notification of the escape to the law enforcement agency of the county or city in which the hospital or facility is located. If that notification is given, the time and date of notification, the person notified, and the person making the notification shall be noted in the written notification required by this section.

(e) Photocopying is not required in order to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(f) No public or private entity or public or private employee shall be liable for damages caused, or alleged to be caused, by the release of information or the failure to release information pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 189.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7325.5.

Notwithstanding Section 5328, information regarding a person’s name, reason for commitment, age, physical description, and any other information which the medical director of the treatment facility considers essential in aiding apprehension of the escapee shall be released if the person has escaped from a state mental health facility, and the person was committed to the state mental health facility by a court after being found not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to Section 1026 of the Penal Code, unable to stand trial due to mental condition pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code, or a mentally disordered sex offender pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1415, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

7326.

Any person who willfully assists any judicially committed or remanded patient of a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility to escape, to attempt to escape therefrom, or to resist being returned from a leave of absence shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both such imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not more than one year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both such imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 624.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

7327.

Every peace officer who is designated in and pursuant to Section 7325 delivers or assists in the delivery of a patient to a state hospital or other place designated by a state hospital shall be entitled to receive from the state hospital such fees and expenses as are payable to sheriffs for conveyance of patients to state hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7328.

Whenever a person who is committed to an institution subject to the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, under one of the commitment laws that provides for reimbursement for care and treatment to the state by the county of commitment of the person, is accused of committing a crime while confined in the institution and is committed by the court in which the crime is charged to another institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the state rather than the county of commitment shall bear the subsequent cost of supporting and caring for the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 190.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7329.

(a) When a patient, who is subject to judicial commitment, has escaped from a public mental hospital in a state of the United States other than California and is present in this state, a peace officer, health officer, county physician, or assistant county physician may take the person into custody within five years after the escape. The person may be admitted and detained in the quarters provided in a county hospital or state hospital upon application of the peace officer, health officer, county physician, or assistant county physician. The application shall be in writing and shall state the identity of the person, the name and place of the institution from which he or she escaped and the approximate date of the escape, and the fact that the person has been apprehended pursuant to this section.

(b) As soon as possible after the person is apprehended, the district attorney of the county in which the person is present shall file a petition in the superior court alleging the facts of the escape, and requesting an immediate hearing on the question of whether the person has escaped from a public mental hospital in another state within five years prior to his or her apprehension. The hearing shall be held within three days after the day on which the person was taken into custody. If the court finds that the person has not escaped from such a hospital within five years prior to his or her apprehension, he or she shall be released immediately.

(c) If the court finds that the person did escape from a public mental hospital in another state within five years prior to his or her apprehension, the superintendent or physician in charge of the quarters provided in the county hospital or
 state hospital may care for and treat the person, and the district attorney of the county in which the person is present immediately shall present to a judge of the superior court a petition asking that the person be judicially committed to a state hospital in this state. The hearing on the petition shall be held within seven days after the court’s determination in the original hearing that the person did escape from a public mental hospital in another state within five years prior to his apprehension. Proceedings shall thereafter be conducted as on a petition for judicial commitment of the particular type of person subject to judicial commitment. If the court finds that the person is subject to judicial commitment it shall order him or her judicially committed to a state hospital in this state; otherwise, it shall order him or her to be released. It shall be the duty of the superintendent of the state hospital to accept custody of the person, if he or she has been determined to be subject to judicial
 commitment. The State Department of State Hospitals will promptly cause the person to be returned to the institution from which he or she escaped if the authorities in charge of the institution agree to accept him or her. If the authorities refuse to accept the person, the superintendent of the state hospital in which the person is confined shall continue to care for and treat the person in the same manner as any other person judicially committed to the hospital as having a mental health disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 127.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Leave of Absence, Discharge, and Restoration to Capacity of Persons Other Than the Mentally Disordered Criminals [7350. - 7362.]

7350.

The provisions of this article except for Section 7355 shall not apply to any patient held upon an order of a court or judge in a proceeding arising out of a criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1291.)
-------------------------------------------

7351.

Wherever in any provision of this code heretofore or hereafter enacted the term “parole” is used in relation to the release of a patient from a state hospital, it shall be construed to refer to and mean “leave of absence.” A judicially committed patient or patient with an intellectual disability granted a leave of absence on or after July 1, 1969, and a patient on leave of absence as of July 1, 1969, may at any time during the period of the leave of absence be recalled and returned to the hospital.

Upon the release of a judicially committed patient as granted by the medical director of a state hospital, on leave of absence or discharge upon any of the grounds provided in this article, in accordance with the rules and
 regulations prescribed by the department, the superintendent shall issue to or on behalf of the judicially committed patient a document stating the general terms or limitations of the leave of absence, or a certificate stating the general condition of, or the reason for, the discharge of the judicially committed patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 66.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7352.

(a) The medical director of a state hospital may grant a leave of absence to a judicially committed patient, except as provided in Section 7350, under general conditions prescribed by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals may continue to render services to patients placed on leave of absence prior to July 1, 1969, to the extent those services are authorized by law in effect immediately preceding July 1, 1969.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 128.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7352.5.

The medical director of a state hospital for the developmentally disabled may grant a leave of absence to any developmentally disabled patient or judicially committed patient, except as provided in Section 7350, under general conditions prescribed by the State Department of Developmental Services.

The State Department of Developmental Services may continue to render services to patients placed on leave of absence prior to July 1, 1969, to the extent such services are authorized by law in effect immediately preceding July 1, 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

7353.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall pay the premium for third-party health coverage for Medicare beneficiaries who are patients at state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals. The department shall, when a mental health state hospital patient’s coverage would lapse due to lack of sufficient income or financial resources, or any other reason, continue the health coverage by paying the costs of continuation or group coverage pursuant to federal law or converting from a group to an individual plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 193.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7354.

(a) A person with a mental health disorder may be granted care in a licensed institution or other suitable licensed or certified facility. The State Department of State Hospitals may pay for that care at a rate not exceeding the average cost of care of patients in the state hospitals, as determined by the Director of State Hospitals. The payments shall be made from funds available to the State Department of State Hospitals for that purpose.

(b) The State Department of State Hospitals may make payments for services for patients who have mental health disorders in private facilities released or discharged from state hospitals on the basis of reimbursement for reasonable cost, using the same standards and rates consistent with those established by the State Department
 of Health Care Services for similar types of care. The payments shall be made within the limitation of funds appropriated to the State Department of State Hospitals for that purpose.

(c) No payments for care or services of a patient with a mental health disorder shall be made by the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to this section unless the care or services are requested by the local director of the mental health services of the county of the patient’s residence, unless provision for the care or services is made in the county Short-Doyle plan of the county under which the county shall reimburse the department for 10 percent of the amount expended by the department, exclusive of the portion of the cost that is provided by the federal government.

(d) The provision for the 10-percent county share shall be inapplicable with respect to a county with a population of under
 100,000 persons that has not elected to participate financially in providing services under Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) in accordance with Section 5709.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 129.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7354.5.

Any developmentally disabled person may be granted care in a licensed institution or other suitably licensed or certified facility. The State Department of Developmental Services may pay for such care at a rate not exceeding the average cost of care of patients in the state hospitals as determined by the Director of Developmental Services. Such payments shall be made from funds available to the State Department of Developmental Services for that purpose.

The State Department of Developmental Services may make payments for services for developmentally disabled patients in private facilities released or discharged from state hospitals on the basis of reimbursement for reasonable cost, using the same standards and rates consistent with those established by the State Department of Developmental Services for similar types of care. Such payments shall be made within the limitation of funds appropriated to the State Department of Developmental Services for that purpose. No payments for care or services of a developmentally disabled person shall be made by the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to this section, unless requested by the regional center having jurisdiction over the patient and provision for such care or services is made in the areawide plan for the developmentally disabled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

7355.

No patient shall be discharged or, granted a leave of absence, or placed on parole or outpatient care from a state hospital without suitable clothing adapted to the season in which he is discharged; and, if it cannot otherwise be obtained, the superintendent, under general conditions prescribed by the department having jurisdiction of the hospital, shall furnish such clothing and money, not exceeding fifty dollars ($50), to defray the necessary expenses of such patient who is going on leave of absence, parole or outpatient care or is to be discharged, until he can reach his relatives or friends, or find employment to earn a subsistence.

The superintendent may, under general conditions prescribed by the department having jurisdiction of the hospital, furnish to patients while on leave of absence such incidental moneys, supplies or services as are necessary and advisable in the care, supervision and rehabilitation of such patients on leave of absence. Payments therefor shall be made from funds available for support of patients in the state hospital or hospitals from which such patients have been granted a leave of absence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1291.)
-------------------------------------------

7356.

The charges for the care and keeping of persons on leave of absence from a state hospital where the State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Developmental Services, or the State Department of Social Services pays for the care shall be a liability of the person, his or her estate, and relatives, to the same extent that the liability exists for patients in state hospitals.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall collect or adjust the charges in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 7275) of Chapter 3 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 195.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7357.

The superintendent of a state hospital, on filing his or her written certificate with the Director of State Hospitals, may discharge a patient who, in his or her judgment, has recovered or did not, at time of admission, have a mental health disorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 130.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7359.

The superintendent of a state hospital, on filing his or her written certificate with the Director of State Hospitals, may discharge as improved, or may discharge as unimproved, as the case may be, any judicially committed patient who is not recovered, but whose discharge, in the judgment of the superintendent, will not be detrimental to the public welfare, or injurious to the patient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 197.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7360.

The medical superintendent shall not refuse to discharge any judicially committed patient as improved, on the ground that the guardian, friends, or relatives of the patient are not financially able and willing to care properly for the patient after his discharge. Any patient whose condition has improved so as to render him eligible for discharge under Section 7359 and whose guardian, friends, or relatives are not financially able and willing to care properly for him after his discharge shall be returned to the county from which he was committed, at the expense of the county, and shall be cared for by the county as are other indigent persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

7361.

When the superintendent is unwilling to certify to the discharge of an unrecovered judicially committed patient, upon request, and so certifies in writing, giving his reasons therefor, any superior judge of the county in which the hospital is situated, upon such certificate, and upon any other proofs produced before him, after affording opportunity for a hearing to the superintendent, may direct, by order, the discharge of the patient, upon such security to the people of the state as he may require for the good behavior and maintenance of the patient. The certificate and the proof, and the order granted thereon, shall be filed in the clerk’s office of the county in which the hospital is situated, and a certified copy of the order shall be filed in the hospital from which the patient is discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7362.

(a) The medical superintendent of a state hospital, on filing his or her written certificate with the Director of State Hospitals, may on his or her own motion, and shall on the order of the State Department of State Hospitals, discharge a patient who comes within any of the following descriptions:

(1) Who is not a proper case for treatment therein.

(2) Who has a developmental disability or a chronic harmless mental health disorder.

(b) The person, when discharged, shall be returned to the county of his or her residence at the expense of the county, and delivered to the sheriff or other appropriate county official to be designated by the
 board of supervisors, for delivery to the official or agency in that county charged with the responsibility for the person. Should the person be a poor and indigent person, he or she shall be cared for by the county as are other indigent poor.

(c) No person who has been discharged from a state hospital under the provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be again committed to a state hospital unless he or she is subject to judicial commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 131.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Disposition of Mentally Disordered Criminals Upon Recovery [7375. - 7375.]

7375.

Whenever a convict is received into a state hospital under the provisions of Section 2684 of the Penal Code, the medical director of the state hospital shall, 90 days after the arrival of such person and each six months thereafter, report to the Director of Corrections regarding the status and progress of the person. The convict shall, on recovery, be returned to prison in accordance with the provisions of Section 2685 of the Penal Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 547, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. State Hospitals for the Developmentally Disabled [7500. - 7518.]

7500.

There is established in the state, Porterville Developmental Center, in Tulare County, a state hospital for the care and treatment of persons with developmental disabilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 58.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.

(a) The Department of General Services, in cooperation with the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of State Hospitals, may sell or lease property within the boundaries of Camarillo State Hospital described in subdivision (b) to Ventura County which shall sublet the property to a nonprofit
 organization for the purpose of constructing and operating a children’s crisis care center to provide an alternative to emergency shelter home placement. The facility shall provide for an interagency program for the delivery of medical, educational, and mental health screening, crisis intervention, short-term mental health treatment, and case management services for children who are removed from their families due to abuse, neglect, abandonment, sexual molestation, or who are in acute mental health crisis requiring short-term nonhospital care and supervision described in subdivision (c).

(b) (1) The property is a 22.8 acre portion of Rancho Guadalasca, in the County of Ventura, State of California, as described in the Letters of Patent dated September 1, 1873, recorded in Book 1, Page 153 of Patents, in the office of the County Recorder of the county and described as follows:

Beginning at the northwesterly terminus of the Fourth Course of that parcel described in the deed recorded on June 9, 1932, in Book 358, Page 371 of Official Records, in said Recorder’s Office; thence, along said Fourth Course,1st —South 47°23'33″ East 1150.00 feet to the northeasterly terminus of the 38th Course of Parcel 1 described in the deed recorded on April 17, 1973, in Book 4101, Page 237 of said Official Records; thence, along said 38th Course,2nd —South 42°37'00″ West 1026.00 feet; thence, parallel with the First Course herein,3rd —North 47°23'33″ West 800.00 feet; thence, parallel with the Second Course herein,4th —North 42°37'00″ East 666.00 feet; thence, parallel with the First Course herein,5th —North 47°23'33″ West 350.00 feet to the intersection with the Third Course of said parcel described in the deed recorded in Book 358, Page 371 of said Official Records; thence, along said Third Course,6th —North 42°37'00″ East 360.00 feet to the point of beginning.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the parcel described in this subdivision is purchased or
 leased from the state, 50 percent of the proceeds shall accrue to the State Department of State Hospitals and 50 percent to the Department of Developmental Services.

(3) The Department of General Services may enter into a sale or lease at less than fair market value. The department is authorized to lease the parcel for not less than 40, but not more than 99 years.

(c) Any of the following children are eligible for placement in the children’s crisis care center:

(1) Any child who has been placed in protective custody and legally detained under Section 300 as a victim of abuse, neglect, or abandonment. The child shall be one day through 17 years of age. An infant born suffering from the result of perinatal substance abuse, or an infant who requires shelter care because of physical abuse resulting in a cast on the arm
 or leg shall also be eligible.

(2) Any dependent minor of the juvenile court whose placement has been disrupted, and who is in need of temporary placement, as well as crisis intervention and assessment services.

(3) Any voluntarily placed emotionally disturbed child in crisis as determined appropriate by the mental health case manager. The purpose of this placement is to deescalate the crisis, provide assessment and diagnostic services for a recommendation of appropriate treatment and ongoing placement, and to reduce the utilization of private or state psychiatric hospitalization.

(4) Any eligible child who is a resident of any county in California, subject to the availability of space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 72.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.5.

(a) The Department of General Services, in cooperation with the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of State Hospitals, may lease property within the boundaries of Camarillo State Hospital described in subdivision (c) to Ventura County, which may sublet the property to one or more responsible organizations selected by Ventura County for the purposes of constructing housing or operating residential care services, or both, designed to meet the identified treatment and rehabilitation needs of persons with mental health disorders from Ventura County. The lease between the state and Ventura County shall contain a provision that requires that the lease shall terminate and that full title, possession, and control of the property shall return to the state if permits have not been issued for construction
 of the housing prior to January 1, 1995. The sublease between Ventura County and the responsible bidder shall contain a provision that requires that permits for construction of the housing be issued prior to January 1, 1995, and shall contain a provision that requires that the sublease shall terminate and full title, possession, and control of the property shall return to the state if permits have not been issued for construction of the housing prior to January 1, 1995.

(b) In selecting a service provider pursuant to subdivision (a), Ventura County shall only consider a sublease with organizations that comply with subdivision (b) of Section 5705 and Section 523 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) (1) The property consists of a 15 plus acre portion of a 58.5 acre parcel at Camarillo State Hospital that has previously been declared surplus by
 the State Department of Developmental Services. The acreage is on Lewis Road at the entrance to Camarillo State Hospital. Specific metes and bounds shall be established for the 15 plus acre parcel prior to the actual lease of the property.

(2) The Department of General Services may enter into a lease at less than fair market value. The department is authorized to lease the parcel for not less than 40 and not more than
 99 years.

(d) If there is available space, persons who have mental health disorders from Los Angeles, San Luis Obispo, and Santa Barbara Counties may be eligible for placement at this center if an agreement to that effect is entered into between those counties and Ventura County. The agreement shall specify that Los Angeles, San Luis Obispo, and Santa Barbara Counties shall retain responsibility for monitoring and maintenance of persons with mental health disorders who are placed through those agreements and for payment of costs incurred or services rendered by Ventura County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 133.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.

The state institution, the site for which was provided for by an appropriation made by Chapter 28 of the 55th (Fourth Extraordinary Session) Session of the Legislature, shall be known as Porterville State Hospital and shall be used for epileptics who are developmentally disabled and for other developmentally disabled patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.5.

(a) An individual may be admitted to the secure treatment facility at Porterville Developmental Center, as provided in paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505, only when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The unit to which the individual will be admitted is approved for occupancy and licensed.

(2) Until June 30, 2023, the population of the secure treatment facility is no more than 231 persons.
 On and after July 1, 2023, the population of the secure treatment facility is no more than 211 persons.

(3) The individual is at least 18 years of age.

(4) The regional center notifies the regional resource development project identified in Section 4418.7, the regional center clients’ rights advocate, the individual, or the individual’s legal guardian or conservator, as appropriate, of a potential admission pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(5) The regional resource development project completes an assessment of the individual’s services and supports needs, including by visiting the consumer, if appropriate. The assessment shall include consideration of placement options and other necessary services and supports, if any, that could meet the individual’s
 needs in the community.

(b) An individual may be admitted to the transitional treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The individual was admitted to Porterville Developmental Center pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(2) The individual remains eligible for commitment pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505.

(3) The unit to which the individual will be admitted is approved for occupancy and licensed.

(4) The population of the transitional treatment program is no more than 60 persons.

(c) As soon as
 possible, but no later than 30 days following admission to the transitional treatment program, the regional center, in coordination with the developmental center, shall do both of the following:

(1) Complete a comprehensive assessment that shall include the identification of services and supports needed to transition the individual to the community.

(2) Jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to discuss the comprehensive assessment and develop a plan to transition the individual to the community pursuant to Section 4418.3. The transition plan shall be based upon the individual’s needs, developed through the individual program plan process, and shall ensure that needed services and supports will be in place at the time the individual moves. Individual supports and services shall include, when appropriate for the individual, wrap-around services through intensive
 individualized support services. The transition shall be to a community living arrangement that is in the least restrictive environment appropriate to the needs of the individual and most protective of the individual’s rights to dignity, freedom, and choice, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 4648. The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the individual program plan meeting and may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(d) An individual described in this section shall not be placed in the transitional treatment program for longer than necessary to procure a less restrictive placement. Each year, pursuant to Section 4418.25, an individual in the transitional treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center shall receive an updated comprehensive assessment that shall include all of the following:

(1) The reason or reasons for placement in the program for longer than one year.

(2) A description of the issue or issues preventing community placement.

(3) The estimated timeframe
 for placement in the community and the plan for that placement.

(e) Before March 1 of each year, the department shall provide the following information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature:

(1) For each regional center, the number of transitional program residents who are placed in the program for more than one year.

(2) A description of reasons for placement in the program beyond one year.

(3) The steps undertaken to resolve the issue or issues prohibiting community placement.

(4) The additional steps necessary before community placement can be made.

(f) (1) Prior to issuing a request for proposal for a contract to provide the intensive transitional services for individuals residing in the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center, the department shall consult with the appropriate professionals to develop the parameters for the services to be provided in the contract. The department shall also consult with the protection and advocacy agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 regarding appropriate safeguards for the protection of clients’ rights. The department shall ensure that the services are not punitive, are protective of the individual’s rights to dignity, freedom, and choice, and are tailored to the needs of the individual and developed through a person-centered planning process and whether the transition and placement are adequate for the protection and safety of others from the dangers posed by the individual’s known behaviors and for the welfare of the individual. The department shall further ensure that the
 regional center clients’ rights advocate receives notice of each individual program plan meeting in which the intensive transitional supports are discussed and a copy of any assessment regarding the individual’s intensive support needs, and shall ensure that if the individual disagrees with the proposed intensive transitional supports, the individual may request a fair hearing pursuant to Section 4710.5.

(2) By December 31, 2018, the department shall promulgate emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) regarding the intensive transitional services for individuals residing in the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 31.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing September 28, 2018, and until June 30, 2024, or the opening of completed and licensed complex needs homes identified in the safety net plan prepared pursuant to Section 4474.16 and approved for development in the Budget Act of 2023, whichever is earlier, a court may order the commitment of an individual to a separate and distinct unit of Canyon Springs Community Facility, as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505. No more than 10 beds at the facility shall be designated for this purpose.

(b) Prior to admission to Canyon Springs Community Facility of an individual meeting the criteria of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7505, the regional center and regional resource development project shall follow the preadmission procedures, including notification and assessment procedures,
 specified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 4418.7. Upon admission, the postadmission procedures and timelines specified in subdivision (e) of Section 4418.7 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 44, Sec. 29.   (AB 121)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.

The object of each hospital is such care, treatment, habilitation, training, and education of the persons committed thereto as will render them more comfortable and happy and better fitted to care for and support themselves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1040.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter the provisions on state institutions in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 5 of this code shall apply to the state hospitals for the developmentally disabled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Developmental Services shall not admit anyone to a developmental center unless the person has been determined eligible for services under Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) and the person is any of the following:

(1) An adult committed by a court to Porterville Developmental Center, secure treatment program, pursuant to Section 1370.1 of the Penal Code.

(2) Committed by a court to an acute crisis home operated by the department pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 due to an acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7.

(3) An adult committed by a court to Porterville Developmental Center, secure treatment program, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 as a result of involvement with the criminal justice system, and the court has determined the person is mentally incompetent to stand trial.

(4) A person committed by a court to Canyon Springs Community Facility pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 on or before June 30, 2024, or the opening of completed and licensed complex needs homes identified in the safety net plan prepared pursuant to Section 4474.16 and approved for development in the Budget Act of 2023, whichever is earlier, who otherwise meets the criteria for admission described in Section 4418.7 due to an acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7.

(5) (A) A person committed by a court to the Canyon Springs Community Facility pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 on or before June 30, 2024, or the opening of completed and licensed complex needs homes identified in the safety net plan prepared pursuant to Section 4474.16 and approved for development in the Budget Act of 2023, whichever is earlier, who is currently admitted to either an acute psychiatric hospital or an acute crisis facility pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 due to an acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7, but who requires continued treatment to achieve stabilization and successful community transition.

(B) Prior to admission pursuant to this paragraph, the regional center shall prepare an
 assessment for inclusion in the consumer’s file detailing all considered community-based services and supports, including, but not limited to, rate adjustments as provided by law, supplemental services as set forth in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, emergency and crisis intervention services as set forth in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, community crisis home services pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6 of Division 4.5, and an explanation of why those options could not meet the consumer’s needs. Prior to admission, the Director of Developmental Services or the director’s designee shall certify that there are no community-based options that can meet the consumer’s needs.
